Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 21 Employment of Veterans

30-21-1.
Reinstatement by previous employer required.

If any employee enters the land, naval, and air forces of the United States of America, upon his or her honorable discharge from service, his or her former employer, if requested within forty (40) days after honorable discharge and if the employee is still qualified to perform the duties of his or her former position, shall reinstate the employee to his or her former employment or to a position of like seniority, status, and pay, unless the employer’s circumstances have so changed as to make it impossible or unreasonable to do so, and nothing in this section shall be construed at any time to prevent the employer, if so requested, from restoring any employee by releasing any other employee of like or different status and pay or from granting employment to other honorably discharged servicemembers in the same manner as though they had entered service as employees of that employer. Any person, firm, or corporation violating any of the provisions of this section shall be subject to the penalty of a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1351, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-21-1

.

30-21-2.
Seniority rights on reemployment by prior employer.

Any member of the armed forces of the United States or any citizen of the United States who served in the armed forces of the united nations during World War II shall, upon his or her reemployment by a prior employer within one year after his or her honorable discharge from the armed forces, upon proper proof of his or her service and the length thereof, be given by the employer, in addition to the seniority rights he or she had when he or she left that employment prior to his or her joining the armed forces, additional seniority rights equal to the time he served in the armed forces.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1562, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-21-2

.

30-21-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1562, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-21-3

; Repealed by P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 64, § 1, effective June 21, 1985.

30-21-4.
Waiver of rights.

Any veteran employee described in §

30-21-2

may waive any or all of the rights granted him or her by §§

30-21-2

—

30-21-7

. The form of the waiver shall be prescribed by the director of labor and training.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1562, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

30-21-4

.

30-21-5.
Rights of other veterans preserved.

The provisions of §§

30-21-2

—

30-21-7

shall not apply so as to give any veteran of World War II any preference over any honorably discharged veteran of any other war in which the United States has participated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1562, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

30-21-5

.

30-21-6.
Hiring of unqualified persons not required.

Nothing in §§

30-21-2

—

30-21-7

shall require any employer to hire any person who, in the judgment of the employer, is not qualified for the position.

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1562, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

30-21-6

.

30-21-7.
Failure to allow proper seniority.

Anyone knowingly violating any provision of §§

30-21-2

—

30-21-6

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1945, ch. 1562, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

30-21-7

.

30-21-8.
Preference in public employment — Notice to community service division.

In every public department and upon all public works of this state, any honorably discharged soldier, sailor, or marine who served in the army or navy of the United States during the Spanish-American war, Philippine insurrection, China relief expedition, or world war I, and who, having been disabled in service, and at the time of his or her application for employment, is a qualified elector of this state, shall be preferred for appointment and employment. Age, loss of limb, or other physical impairment, which does not in fact incapacitate, shall not disqualify the veteran, if he or she possesses the other requisite qualifications. Whenever any department, division, bureau, board, or commission in this state shall have a vacant position available, the department, division, bureau, board, or commission, shall notify the assistant director of human services in charge of the community services division that a vacancy exists.

History of Section.

P.L. 1923, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 1924, ch. 557, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 650, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-21-8

.

30-21-9.
Custodial service in public buildings.

All vacancies that may occur in the employment of janitors, elevator operators, caretakers, or any positions in the custodian service in any building owned or maintained by this state or any department of this state shall be filled in the following order of preference:

By war veterans having a service connected disability, whose disability does not in fact handicap them in qualifying for a particular position;

By war veterans having a nonservice connected disability, whose disability does not in fact handicap them in qualifying for a particular position; and

By war veterans with no disability.

This section shall apply to persons who served in the armed forces of the United States during World War I or the Spanish-American War.

History of Section.

P.L. 1938, ch. 2562, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 650, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-21-9

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 43.

30-21-10.
Notice of vacancies in custodial service.

The chief of each division shall notify the assistant director of human services in charge of the community services division of any vacancies to be filled in accordance with the provisions of §

30-21-9

. He or she shall, in turn, notify all veterans’ organizations having a Rhode Island department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1938, ch. 2562, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 650, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-21-10

.

30-21-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1938, ch. 2562, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 650, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

30-21-11

; Repealed by P.L. 1986, ch. 60, § 1, effective May 29, 1986.

30-21-12.
Appointment to police or fire forces.

Any citizen who has served in the military service of the United States, in the army, navy, or air force thereof, and who has received an honorable discharge therefrom, may be eligible for appointment as a police officer or firefighter in any city or town of this state in the same manner as though that citizen were a qualified elector of the city or town on the date of his or her appointment; provided, however, that the citizen, if registered at any time during the military service, would be a qualified elector of that city or town at the date of that appointment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1929, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 132, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 652, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-21-12

.

30-21-13.
Extension of credits, benefits, and privileges.

All credits, benefits, and privileges, excepting bonuses, granted and bestowed as of December 7, 1941 by the state upon men or women in the armed forces, shall be extended to include those veterans of the Desert Storm conflict, beginning August 2, 1990, and continuing to the present, honorably discharged from active duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 43.

30-21-14.
Preference in private employment.

A private employer may adopt an employment policy that provides a preference in hiring or promotion, or both, to a veteran.

A policy adopted under this section shall:

Be in writing; and

Be uniformly applied to employment decisions regarding hiring and promotion.

A private employer may require that a veteran submit a Department of Defense DD Form 214 or similar documentation of separation from the U.S. Armed Forces to be eligible for a preference in hiring or promotion pursuant to this section.

As used in this section, “veteran” means an individual who served on active duty in the U.S. Armed Forces and received an honorable or general discharge.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 365, § 1.